Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3805
Franchise tax; multistate financial institution; computation.

If a financial institution is subject to tax in more than one state:

(1) The tax imposed in section 77-3802 shall be based on the amount of average deposits connected with the financial institution's operations in this state. Such deposits shall be (a) deposits which are accepted at the financial institution's offices located in this state plus (b) deposits which are solicited from residents in this state even if accepted at an office of the financial institution outside of this state; and

(2) The limitation on the tax prescribed in subdivision (2) of section 77-3804 shall be computed using the portion of the net financial income of the financial institution that is apportioned to this state through the use of the property and payroll factors contained in sections 77-2734.12 and 77-2734.13.

Laws 1986, LB 774, § 5.